West Virginia, session 2025, HB2332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of Commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §20-2-11 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (transporting and selling wildlife parts and pelts, 58 CSR 16), is authorized.